Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-1229
License; person on national registry.

The department may issue a license to any individual who has a current certificate from the National Registry of Emergency Medical Technicians.

Laws 1997, LB 138, § 18;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-5189;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 513;

Laws 2018, LB1034, § 27.